California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) A law enforcement agency shall release, upon request, a copy of a juvenile police record described in paragraph (1) to the minor who is the subject of the juvenile police record and their parent or guardian only if identifying information pertaining to any other juvenile, within the meaning of subdivision (d), has been removed from the record.

(b) (1) The law enforcement agency in possession of the juvenile police record described in subdivision (a) shall seal the applicable juvenile police record and
 all other records in its custody relating to the minor’s law enforcement contact or referral and participation in a diversion program as follows:

(A) Any juvenile police record created following a law enforcement contact with a minor described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be considered confidential and deemed not to exist while the minor is completing a diversion program, except to the law enforcement agency, the service provider, the minor who is the subject of the police record, and their parent or guardian. The diversion service provider shall notify the referring law enforcement agency of a minor’s satisfactory completion of a diversion program within 30 days of the minor’s satisfactory completion. The law enforcement agency shall seal the juvenile police record no later than 30 days from the date of notification
 by the diversion service provider of the minor’s satisfactory completion of a diversion program.

(B) Any juvenile police record created following a law enforcement contact with a minor described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be sealed no later than 60 days from the date of verification that the minor has not been referred to probation or any district attorney. Verification shall be completed within six months of the decision to counsel and release the minor.

(C) Any juvenile police record created following a law enforcement contact with a minor described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be sealed immediately upon verification that the minor does not fall within the jurisdiction of the juvenile delinquency court under
 current state law.

(D) Upon sealing of the records under this subdivision, the offense giving rise to the police record shall be deemed to not have occurred and the individual may respond accordingly to any inquiry, application, or process in which disclosure of this information is requested or sought.

(2) A law enforcement agency that seals a juvenile police record pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall notify the applicable diversion service provider and the Department of Justice immediately upon sealing of the record. Any records in the diversion service provider’s custody relating to the minor’s law enforcement contact or referral and participation in the program shall not be inspected by anyone other than the service provider, and shall be released only to the
 minor who is the subject of the record and their parent or guardian, as described in subdivision (c).

(3) If the minor is a dependent of the juvenile court, the law enforcement agency shall notify the minor’s social worker that the juvenile police records have been sealed and that any such records in the social worker’s custody relating to the minor’s law enforcement contact or referral and participation in a diversion program shall also be sealed.

(4) (A) A law enforcement agency shall notify a minor in writing that their police record has been sealed pursuant to paragraph (1). If the law enforcement agency determines that a minor’s juvenile police record is not eligible for sealing pursuant to paragraph (1), the law enforcement agency shall notify the
 minor in writing of its determination.

(B) An individual who receives notice from a law enforcement agency that they are not eligible for sealing under paragraph (1) may request reconsideration of the law enforcement agency’s determination by submitting to the law enforcement agency a petition to seal a report of a law enforcement agency and any documentation supporting their eligibility for sealing under paragraph (1). For purposes of this subparagraph, a sworn statement by the petitioner shall qualify as supporting documentation.

(5) Police records sealed under paragraph (1) shall not be considered part of the “juvenile case file,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 827.

(6) (A) Any
 police record that has been sealed pursuant to this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized by the prosecuting attorney in order to meet a statutory or constitutional obligation to disclose favorable or exculpatory evidence to a defendant in a criminal case in which the prosecuting attorney has reason to
 believe that access to the record is necessary to meet the disclosure obligation.

(B) (i) A prosecuting attorney shall not use information contained in a record sealed pursuant to this section for any purpose other than those provided in subparagraph (A).

(ii) Once the case referenced in subparagraph (A) has been closed and is no longer subject to review on appeal, the prosecuting attorney shall destroy any records obtained pursuant to this subparagraph.

(c) (1) Diversion service provider records related to the provision of diversion services to a minor described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not be considered part of a “juvenile
 case file,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 827, and shall be kept confidential except to the minor who is the subject of the record or information and their parent or guardian. This section does not require the release of confidential records created, collected, or maintained by diversion service providers in the course of diversion service delivery.

(2) (A) If any other state or federal law or regulation grants access to portions of, or information relating to, the contents of a diversion service provider record related to diversion, the requirements of that state or federal law or regulation governing access to the record or portions thereof shall prevail.

(B) The release of any diversion service provider records related to diversion by any party with
 access under applicable California state or federal laws shall be governed by those applicable state or federal laws, and shall otherwise be prohibited.

(3) Diversion service providers shall release diversion service provider records to the minor who is the subject of the record, or their parent or guardian, upon receiving a signature authorization by the minor, parent, or guardian and using existing internal confidentiality procedures of the service provider.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Juvenile police record” refers to records or information relating to the taking of a minor into custody, temporary custody, or detention.

(2) With
 respect to a juvenile police record, “any other juvenile” refers to additional minors who were taken into custody or temporary custody, or detained and who also could be considered a subject of the juvenile police record.

(3) “Diversion” refers to an intervention that redirects youth away from formal processing in the juvenile justice system, including, but not limited to, counsel and release or a referral to a diversion program as defined in Section 1457.

(4) “Diversion service provider” refers to an agency or organization providing diversion services to a minor.

(5) “Diversion service provider record” refers to any records or information collected, created, or maintained by the service provider in connection to
 providing diversion program services to the minor.

(6) “Satisfactory completion” refers to substantial compliance by the participant with the reasonable terms of program participation that are within the capacity of the participant to perform, as determined by the service provider.

(e) On or before January 1, 2022, the Judicial Council, in consultation with the California Law Enforcement Association of Record Supervisors (CLEARS), shall develop forms for distribution by law enforcement agencies to the public to implement this section. Those forms shall include, but are not limited to, the Petition to Seal Report of Law Enforcement Agency. The material for the public shall include information about the persons who are entitled to a copy of the juvenile police record described in subdivision
 (a) and the specific procedures for requesting a copy of the record if a petition is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 811, Sec. 5.   (AB 1877)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

828.

(a) (1) Except as provided in Sections 389, 781, 786, 827.9, and 827.95 of this code or Section 1203.45 of the Penal Code, any information gathered by a law enforcement agency, including the Department of Justice, relating to the taking of a minor into custody may be disclosed to another law enforcement agency, including a school district police or security department, or to any person or agency that has a legitimate need for the information for purposes of official disposition of a case. When the disposition of a taking into custody is available, it shall be included with any information disclosed.

(2) A court shall consider any information relating to the taking of a minor into custody, if the information is not contained in a record that has
 been sealed, for purposes of determining whether adjudications of commission of crimes as a juvenile warrant a finding that there are circumstances in aggravation pursuant to Section 1170 of the Penal Code or to deny probation.

(b) When a law enforcement agency has been notified pursuant to Section 1155 that a minor has escaped from a secure detention facility, the law enforcement agency shall release the name of, and any descriptive information about, the minor to a person who specifically requests this information. The law enforcement agency may release the information on the minor without a request to do so if it finds that release of the information would be necessary to assist in recapturing the minor or that it would be necessary to protect the public from substantial physical harm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 330, Sec. 4.   (AB 2425)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

828.1.

(a) While the Legislature reaffirms its belief that juvenile criminal records, in general, should be confidential, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide for a limited exception to that confidentiality in cases involving serious acts of violence. Further, it is the intent of the Legislature that even in these selected cases the dissemination of juvenile criminal records be as limited as possible, consistent with the need to work with a student in an appropriate fashion, and the need to protect potentially vulnerable school staff and other students over whom the school staff exercises direct supervision and responsibility.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 828, a school district police or security department may provide written notice to the superintendent of the school district that a minor enrolled in a public school maintained by that school district, in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, has been found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have illegally used, sold, or possessed a controlled substance as defined in Section 11007 of the Health and Safety Code or to have committed any crime listed in paragraphs (1) to (15), inclusive, or paragraphs (17) to (19), inclusive, or paragraphs (25) to (28), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of, or in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of, or subdivision (e) of, Section 707. The information may be expeditiously transmitted to any teacher, counselor, or administrator with direct supervisorial or disciplinary responsibility over the minor, who the superintendent or his or her designee, after consultation with the principal at the school of attendance, believes needs this information to work with the student in an appropriate fashion, to avoid being needlessly vulnerable or to protect other persons from needless vulnerability.

(c) Any information received by a teacher, counselor, or administrator pursuant to this section shall be received in confidence for the limited purpose for which it was provided and shall not be further disseminated by the teacher, counselor, or administrator. An intentional violation of the confidentiality provisions of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 925, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

828.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information relating to the taking of a minor into custody on the basis that he or she has committed a crime against the property, students, or personnel of a school district or a finding by the juvenile court that the minor has committed such a crime may be exchanged between law enforcement personnel, the school district superintendent, and the principal of a public school in which the minor is enrolled as a student if the offense was against the property, students, or personnel of that school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

829.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Prison Terms, in order to evaluate the suitability for release of a person before the board, shall be entitled to review juvenile court records which have not been sealed, concerning the person before the board, if those records relate to a case in which the person was found to have committed an offense which brought the person within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

830.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, members of a multidisciplinary personnel team engaged in the prevention, identification, management, or treatment of child abuse or neglect may disclose and exchange information and writings to and with one another relating to any incidents of child abuse that may also be a part of a juvenile court record or otherwise designated as confidential under state law if the member of the team having that information or writing reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the prevention, identification, management, or treatment of child abuse, or the provision of child welfare services. All discussions relative to the disclosure or exchange of any such information or writings during team meetings are
 confidential unless disclosure is required by law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, testimony concerning any such discussion is not admissible in any criminal, civil, or juvenile court proceeding.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Child abuse” has the same meaning as defined in Section 18951.

(2) “Multidisciplinary personnel” means a team as specified in Section 18951.

(3) “Child welfare services” means those services that are directed at preventing child abuse or neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 2322)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

830.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, members of a juvenile justice multidisciplinary team engaged in the prevention, identification, and control of crime, including, but not limited to, criminal street gang activity, may disclose and exchange nonprivileged information and writings to and with one another relating to any incidents of juvenile crime, including criminal street gang activity, that may also be part of a juvenile court record or otherwise designated as confidential under state law if the member of the team having that information or writing reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the prevention, identification, or control of juvenile crime or criminal street gang activity. Every member of a juvenile justice multidisciplinary team who receives such information or writings shall be under the same privacy and confidentiality obligations and subject to the same penalties for violating those obligations as the person disclosing or providing the information or writings. The information obtained shall be maintained in a manner which ensures the protection of confidentiality.

As used in this section, “nonprivileged information” means any information not subject to a privilege pursuant to Division 8 (commencing with Section 900) of the Evidence Code.

As used in this section, “criminal street gang” has the same meaning as defined in Section 186.22 of the Penal Code.

As used in this section, “multidisciplinary team” means any team of three or more persons, the members of which are trained in the prevention, identification, and control of juvenile crime, including, but not limited to, criminal street gang activity, and are qualified to provide a broad range of services related to the problems posed by juvenile crime and criminal street gangs. The team may include, but is not limited to:

(a) Police officers or other law enforcement agents.

(b) Prosecutors.

(c) Probation officers.

(d) School district personnel with experience or training in juvenile crime or criminal street gang control.

(e) Counseling personnel with experience or training in juvenile crime or criminal street gang control.

(f) State, county, city, or special district recreation specialists with experience or training in juvenile crime or criminal street gang control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 24, Sec. 1.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

831.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to clarify that juvenile court records should remain confidential regardless of the juvenile’s immigration status. Confidentiality is integral to the operation of the juvenile justice system in order to avoid stigma and promote rehabilitation for all youth, regardless of immigration status.

(b) Nothing in this article authorizes the disclosure of juvenile information to federal officials absent a court order of the judge of the juvenile court upon filing a petition as provided by subparagraph (P) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 827.

(c) Nothing in this article authorizes the dissemination of juvenile information to, or by, federal officials absent a court order of the judge of the juvenile court upon filing a petition as provided by subparagraph (P) of paragraph (1) and paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 827.

(d) Nothing in this article authorizes the attachment of juvenile information to any other documents given to, or provided by, federal officials absent prior approval of the presiding judge of the juvenile court as provided by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 827.

(e) For purposes of this section, “juvenile information” includes the “juvenile case file,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 827, and information related to the juvenile, including, but not limited to,
 name, date or place of birth, and the immigration status of the juvenile that is obtained or created independent of, or in connection with, juvenile court proceedings about the juvenile and maintained by any government agency, including, but not limited to, a court, probation office, child welfare agency, or law enforcement agency.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any
 disclosure that would otherwise violate this article.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 267, Sec. 2.   (AB 899)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

832.

(a) (1) To promote more effective communication needed for the development of a plan to address the needs of the child or youth and family, a person designated as a member of a child and family team as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501 may receive and disclose relevant information and records, subject to the confidentiality provisions of state and federal law.

(2) Information exchanged among the team shall be received in confidence for the limited purpose of providing necessary services and supports to the child or youth and family and shall not be further disclosed except to the juvenile court with jurisdiction over the child, subject
 to the privileges and confidentiality requirements of state and federal law, or as otherwise required by law. Civil and criminal penalties may apply to the inappropriate disclosure of information held by the team.

(b) (1) Each participant in the child and family team with legal power to consent shall sign an authorization to release information to team members. In the event that a child or youth who is a dependent or ward of the juvenile court does not have the legal power to consent to the release of information, the child’s attorney or other authorized individual may consent on behalf of the child.

(2) Authorization to release information shall be in writing and shall comply with all other applicable state law governing release of medical, mental health,
 social service, and educational records, and that covers identified team members, including service providers, in order to permit the release of records to the team.

(3) This authorization shall not include release of adoption records.

(4) The knowing and informed consent to release information given pursuant to this section shall only be in force for the time that the child or youth, or family, or nonminor dependent, is participating in the child and family team.

(c) Upon obtaining the authorization to release information as described in subdivision (b), relevant information and records may be shared with members of the team. If the team determines that the disclosure of information would present a reasonable risk
 of a significant adverse or detrimental effect on the child’s or youth’s psychological or physical safety, the information shall not be released.

(d) Information and records communicated or provided to the team, by all providers, programs, and agencies, as well as information and records created by the team in the course of serving its children, youth, and their families, shall be deemed private and confidential and shall be protected from discovery and disclosure by all applicable statutory and common law. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the authority of a health care provider to disclose medical information pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10 of the Civil Code.

(e) If the child welfare agency files or records, or any portions thereof,
 are privileged or confidential, pursuant to any other state law, except Section 827, or federal law or regulation, the requirements of that state law or federal law or regulation prohibiting or limiting release of the child welfare agency files or records, or any portions thereof, shall prevail.

(f) All discussions during team meetings are confidential unless disclosure is required by law. Notwithstanding any other law, testimony concerning any team meeting discussion is not admissible in any criminal or civil proceeding except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department
 shall, by July 1, 2021, issue written instructions to counties that describe all protections provided by statute for the confidentiality of mental health, reproductive and sexual health, and minor drug treatment information concerning minors and nonminor dependents for whom a child and family team meeting is held, including, but not limited to, the duties of therapists not to disclose confidential information, as described in Sections 123115 and 123116 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 1015 of the Evidence Code.

(h) Any request to sign an authorization for the release of information described in subdivision (g) provided to minors or nonminor dependents shall incorporate all statutory protections for the confidentiality of the information, including, but not limited to, their right to consult with an attorney before signing the release of
 information.

(i) As used in this section, “privileged information” means any information subject to a privilege pursuant to Division 8 (commencing with Section 900) of the Evidence Code. Disclosure of otherwise privileged information to team members shall not be construed to waive the privilege.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 780, Sec. 3.   (AB 1068)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22.5. Home Supervision [840. - 842.]

840.

There shall be in each county probation department a program of home supervision to which minors described by Section 628.1 shall be referred. Home supervision is a program in which persons who would otherwise be detained in the juvenile hall are permitted to remain in their homes pending court disposition of their cases, under the supervision of a deputy probation officer, probation aide, or probation volunteer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

841.

The duties of a deputy probation officer, or a probation aide, a community worker or a volunteer under the supervision of a deputy probation officer, assigned to home supervision are to assure the minor’s appearance at probation officer interviews and court hearings and to assure that the minor obeys the conditions of his or her release and commits no public offenses pending final disposition of his or her case. A deputy probation officer, probation aide, or community worker assigned to home supervision shall have a caseload of no more than 10 minors. However, if the county probation department employs a method of home supervision which includes electronic surveillance, the caseload shall be no more than 15 minors. Whenever possible, a minor shall be assigned to a deputy probation officer, probation aide, community worker, or volunteer who resides in the same community as the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

842.

A probation volunteer is a person who donates personal services to the probation department and probationers without compensation. A probation aide or a community worker may receive compensation for such services. Probation aides, community workers, and volunteers shall not qualify for peace officer status pursuant to Section 830.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 23. Wards and Dependent Children—Juvenile Halls [850. - 873.]

850.

The board of supervisors in every county shall provide and maintain, at the expense of the county, in a location approved by the judge of the juvenile court or in counties having more than one judge of the juvenile court, by the presiding judge of the juvenile court, a suitable house or place for the detention of wards and dependent children of the juvenile court and of persons alleged to come within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. Such house or place shall be known as the “juvenile hall” of the county. Wherever, in any provision of law, reference is made to detention homes for juveniles, such reference shall be deemed and construed to refer to the juvenile halls provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

851.

Except as provided in Section 207.1, the juvenile hall shall not be in, or connected with, any jail or prison, and shall not be deemed to be, nor be treated as, a penal institution. It shall be a safe and supportive homelike environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

851.1.

(a) (1) Minors detained in or committed to a juvenile hall shall be provided with access to computer technology and the Internet for the purposes of education.

(2) Minors detained in or committed to a juvenile hall may be provided with access to computer technology and the Internet for maintaining relationships with family.

(b) This section does not limit the authority of the chief probation officer, or his or her designee, to limit or deny access to computer technology or the Internet for safety and security or staffing reasons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 997, Sec. 3.   (AB 2448)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

852.

The juvenile hall shall be under the management and control of the probation officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

853.

The board of supervisors shall provide for a suitable superintendent to have charge of the juvenile hall, and for such other employees as may be needed for its efficient management, and shall provide for payment, out of the general fund of the county, of suitable salaries for such superintendent and other employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

854.

The superintendent and other employees of the juvenile hall shall be appointed by the probation officer, pursuant to a civil service or merit system, and may be removed, for cause, pursuant to such system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

855.

The probation officer shall keep a classified list of expenses for the operation of the juvenile hall and shall file a duplicate copy with the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

856.

The board of supervisors may provide for the establishment of a public elementary school and of a public secondary school in connection with any juvenile hall, juvenile house, day center, juvenile ranch, or juvenile camp, or residential or nonresidential boot camp for the education of the children in those facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 72, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

857.

Whenever a minor is incarcerated in a juvenile hall or other county juvenile facility for a period of at least 30 consecutive days, the facility may inform the State Department of Social Services of the name, date of birth, and social security number of the incarcerated person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

858.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that juveniles with a high school diploma or California high school equivalency certificate who are detained in, or committed to, a juvenile hall shall have access to rigorous postsecondary academic and career technical education programs that fulfill the requirements for transfer to the University of California and the California State University and prepare them for career entry, respectively.

(b) (1) A county probation department in collaboration with a county office of education, and in partnership with the California Community Colleges or the California State University, or in voluntary partnership the University of California, shall ensure that juveniles with a high school diploma or California high
 school equivalency certificate who are detained in, or committed to, a juvenile hall have access to, and can choose to participate in, public postsecondary academic and career technical courses and programs, including courses and programs offered online through asynchronous and synchronous instruction or in-person instruction, and for which they are eligible based on eligibility criteria and course schedules of the in-county, to the extent possible, public postsecondary education campus providing the course or program. County probation departments, in coordination with county offices of education, may use juvenile court school classrooms and computers, in accordance with agreements entered into pursuant to Section 48646 of the Education Code, for the purpose of implementing this section. County probation departments are also encouraged to develop other educational partnerships with local public postsecondary campuses, as is feasible, to provide programs on campus and onsite at the juvenile hall and, to the
 extent offered by a California community college, the California State University, or the University of California, the probation department, in collaboration with the county office of education, shall ensure that juveniles have access to programs and dual enrollment options offered on campus and onsite at the juvenile hall.

(2) These programs shall be considered part of the current responsibilities of the county probation department to provide and coordinate services for juveniles that enable the juveniles to be law-abiding and productive members of their families and communities.

(c) For purposes of this section, “juvenile” means any person detained in, or committed to, a juvenile hall.

(d) This section does not preclude juvenile court school pupils who have not yet completed their high school graduation
 requirements from concurrently participating in postsecondary academic and career technical education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 92.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

862.

In addition to those juveniles specified in Section 850, the probation officer may receive and detain in the county juvenile hall any juvenile committed thereto by process or order issued under the authority of the United States until such juvenile is discharged according to law as if he had been committed under process issued under the authority of this state, provided, that, in the absence of a valid detention order issued by a federal court, such detention shall not exceed three judicial days. Juveniles detained pursuant to this section shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and duties, and shall receive the same treatment, afforded juveniles detained pursuant to the laws of this state. The board of supervisors of a county may contract with the United States for reimbursement of the county’s cost incurred in the support of such juvenile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 250.)
-------------------------------------------

870.

Two or more counties may, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, establish and operate a joint juvenile hall. A joint juvenile hall shall be under the management and control of the probation officers of the participating counties, acting jointly, or of one of such probation officers, as provided by the agreement among the counties, and shall be in the charge of a superintendent selected pursuant to a civil service or merit system. A joint juvenile hall shall be operated in the manner prescribed by this chapter for juvenile halls.

A county participating in the maintenance of a joint juvenile hall pursuant to this section need not maintain a separate juvenile hall.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

871.

(a) Any person under the custody of a probation officer or any peace officer in a county juvenile hall, or committed to a county juvenile ranch, camp, forestry camp, or regional facility, who escapes or attempts to escape from the institution or facility in which he or she is confined, who escapes or attempts to escape while being conveyed to or from such an institution or facility, or who escapes or attempts to escape while outside or away from such an institution or facility while under the custody of a probation officer or any peace officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(b) Any
 person who commits any of the acts described in subdivision (a) by use of force or violence shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment in the state prison.

(c) The willful failure of a person under the custody of a probation officer or any peace officer in a county juvenile hall, or committed to a county juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp, to return to the county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp at the prescribed time while outside or away from the county facility on furlough or temporary release constitutes an escape punishable as provided in subdivision (a). However, a willful failure to return at the prescribed time shall not be considered an escape if the failure to return was reasonable under the circumstances.

(d) A minor who, while under the supervision of a probation officer, removes his or her electronic monitor without authority and who, for more than 48 hours, violates the terms and conditions of his or her probation relating to the proper use of the electronic monitor shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. If an electronic monitor is damaged or discarded while in the possession of the minor, restitution for the cost of replacing the unit may be ordered as part of the punishment.

(e) The liability established by this section shall be limited by the financial ability of the person or persons ordered to pay restitution under this section, who shall be entitled to an evaluation and determination of ability to pay under Section 903.45.

(f) For purposes of this section, “regional
 facility” means any facility used by one or more public entities for the confinement of juveniles for more than 24 hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 16.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

871.5.

(a) Except as authorized by law, or when authorized by the person in charge of any county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, or by an officer of any juvenile hall or camp empowered by the person in charge to give that authorization, any person who knowingly brings or sends into, or who knowingly assists in bringing into, or sending into, any county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, or any person who while confined in any of those institutions possesses therein, any controlled substance, the possession of which is prohibited by Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, any firearm, weapon, or explosive of any kind, or any tear gas or tear gas weapon shall be punished by imprisonment in a
 county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(b) Except as otherwise authorized in the manner provided in subdivision (a), any person who knowingly uses tear gas or uses a tear gas weapon in an institution or camp specified in subdivision (a) is guilty of a felony.

(c) A sign shall be posted at the entrance of each county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp specifying the conduct prohibited by this section and the penalties therefor.

(d) Except as otherwise authorized in the manner provided in subdivision (a), any person who knowingly brings or sends into, or who knowingly assists in bringing into, or sending into, any county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, or any person who while confined in such an institution
 knowingly possesses therein, any alcoholic beverage shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) This section shall not be construed to preclude or in any way limit the applicability of any other law proscribing a course of conduct also proscribed by this section.
